California statutes. Fish and Game Code
(1) The department shall determine the angler harvest of black bass populations and shall recommend to the commission the changes in angling regulations for black bass that would be necessary to prevent or correct overharvest. 

(2) The department shall consider recommending to the commission catch and release regulations for black bass, including minimum or maximum size restrictions and management for trophy-sized black bass in some waters.

(3) The department shall consider the suitability of the many different species, subspecies, and strains of black bass when management programs are formulated.

(4) The department shall improve shoreline habitat for black bass in waters where insufficient habitat exists and shall encourage reservoir operating agencies to carry out shoreline habitat improvement projects.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “black bass” means fishes of the Centrarchidae family.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1302, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7.4. Department-Managed Lands [1745. - 1745.2.]

1745.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Department-managed lands” includes lands, or lands and water, acquired for public shooting grounds, state marine (estuarine) recreational management areas, ecological reserves, and wildlife management areas.

(2) “Nonconsumptive uses” means compatible uses other than hunting and fishing.

(b) (1) Department-managed lands shall be operated on a nonprofit basis by the department.

(2) The department may enter
 into contracts or other agreements for the management and operation of department-managed lands with nonprofit conservation groups, recognized under Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, or resource conservation districts, as described in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 9151) of Division 9 of the Public Resources Code.

(A) The contracts or other agreements authorized pursuant to this paragraph are not subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code or Article 6 (commencing with Section 999) of Chapter 6 of Division 4 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(B) The contracts or other agreements authorized pursuant to this paragraph shall adhere to the goals and objectives included in an approved management plan and shall be consistent with the purpose for which the lands were acquired and managed by the department. Any changes to the
 management plan shall be subject to public review and comment.

(c) Multiple recreational use of department-managed lands is desirable and that use shall be encouraged by the commission. Except for hunting and fishing purposes, only minimum facilities to permit other forms of multiple recreational use, such as camping, picnicking, boating, or swimming, shall be provided.

(d) (1) Hunting, fishing, wildlife viewing, wildlife photography, conservation education, and fish and wildlife research are priority uses compatible with department-managed lands, except for ecological reserves where uses shall be considered on an individual basis.

(2) Public uses of department-managed lands not described in paragraph (1), or subdivision (c) or (f), shall be authorized by regulations adopted by the commission.
 The commission may require the purchase of a special use permit for these other uses.

(e) Except as provided in Section 1765 and subdivision (h), and to defray the costs associated with multiple use, the commission may determine and fix the amount of, and the department shall collect, fees for any use privileges. Only persons holding valid hunting licenses may apply for or obtain shooting permits for department-managed lands.

(f) Commencing January 1, 2015, the department shall require the purchase of an entry permit for nonconsumptive uses of department-managed lands if the department finds that it is practical and would be cost effective for the state to collect entry permit fees.

(g) The following shall apply if the department requires the purchase of an entry permit pursuant to subdivision (f):

(1) The department shall require the purchase of an entry permit for nonconsumptive uses of a department-managed land only if a sign providing notice of the requirement has been posted at the department-managed land.

(2) To the extent feasible, the department shall allow nonconsumptive users to purchase an entry permit onsite.

(3) The department shall use the Automated License Data System to sell an entry permit.

(4) A nonconsumptive user shall have an entry permit in his or her immediate possession while on department-managed lands.

(h) Failure to obtain a permit as required pursuant to this section shall be an infraction as described in Section 12002.2.1. A person in possession of a valid
 hunting license, sport fishing license, or trapping license shall be exempt from a requirement to obtain a permit.

(i) The moneys generated pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Native Species Conservation and Enhancement Account within the Fish and Game Preservation Fund, and shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the department for the management and operation of its lands. To the extent that the department is able to identify the source of the fee revenue collected, the department shall provide no less than 35 percent of the funds generated pursuant to this section to the department-managed lands from which the fee revenues were collected.

(j) The commission and department may continue to allow free access to a department-managed land if the commission or department finds the best interests of that area would be served by not fixing a fee for
 use privileges.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 597, Sec. 1.   (SB 1249)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1745.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, the department may lease department-managed lands for agricultural activities, including, but not limited to, grazing, where consistent with the purpose for which the lands were acquired and compatible with the department’s approved management plan for the area, if available.

(b) The moneys collected from agricultural leases entered into pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be deposited by the department into the Wildlife Restoration Fund or the Fish and Game Preservation Fund and, upon appropriation by the Legislature, may be used to support the management, maintenance, restoration, and operations of department-managed
 lands.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 115, Sec. 8.   (AB 148)   Effective July 22, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1745.2.

(a) The department shall do both of the following:

(1) Consider authorizing apiculture on department-managed wildlife areas, where deemed appropriate by the department.

(2) Determine, when developing or amending its land management plans, the following:

(A) If the department-managed wildlife areas, or any portion of those areas, are suitable for apiculture and whether apiculture is consistent with the management goals and objectives for those areas on a temporary, seasonal, or long-term basis.

(B) If the
 administration of apiculture on department-managed wildlife areas, where deemed appropriate by the department, is meeting the management goals and objectives for those areas.

(C) The appropriate fee and lease rent to be assessed for conducting apiculture on department-managed wildlife areas. The amount of the fee shall be sufficient to recover, but not exceed, all reasonable administrative and implementation costs of the department. The lease rent shall take into account whether the lease is a nonexclusive use of the land.

(b) The department, in implementing this section, may consult with apiculture experts, including, but not limited to, the Department of Food and Agriculture, the University of California, other academic or professional experts, and interested stakeholders, when
 considering authorizing apiculture on department-managed wildlife areas consistent with the respective management goals and objectives for those areas.

(c) Moneys collected for conducting apiculture on department-managed wildlife areas pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall be deposited by the department into the Wildlife Restoration Fund or the Fish and Game Preservation Fund and, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be used to support the management, maintenance, restoration, and operation of department-managed wildlife areas.

(d) The department may authorize the temporary placement of beehives on department-managed wildlife areas through simple lease or permit agreements specifying appropriate conditions. These agreements are not subject to
 competitive bidding requirements.

(e) The department may continue any authorization for apiculture on department-managed areas that it granted before January 1, 2015, without taking further action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 115, Sec. 9.   (AB 148)   Effective July 22, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7.5. Native Species Conservation and Enhancement [1750. - 1773.3.]



  ARTICLE 1. Short Title [1750. - 1750.]

1750.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Native Species Conservation and Enhancement Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 898.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Findings and Declarations [1755. - 1756.]

1755.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) That it is the policy of this state:

(1) To maintain sufficient populations of all species of wildlife and native plants and the habitat necessary to insure their continued existence at the optimum levels possible to insure the policies stated in paragraphs (2), (3), and (4).

(2) To provide for the beneficial use and enjoyment of wildlife and native plants by all citizens of the state.

(3) To perpetuate native plants and all species of wildlife for their intrinsic and ecological values, as well as for their direct benefits to man.

(4) To provide for aesthetic, educational, and nonappropriative uses of the various wildlife and native plant species.

(b) That the conservation and enhancement of wildlife species which are not the object of hunting and native plant species is in the general public interest and it is appropriate that the cost of programs to achieve such conservation and enhancement, including the biological and botanical research necessary thereto, and the diffusion of the information resulting therefrom to the public, be borne to the extent necessary by general public funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1181.)
-------------------------------------------

1756.

(a) The policy set forth in this chapter is in the public interest without regard to the economic value or the lack of economic value of wildlife or native plants.

(b) It is the policy of the state to require the recreational users of the state’s wildlife resources to support the management of lands managed by the department and the management of wildlife consistent with Section 711.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1539, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Bird Habitat Conservation [1758. - 1758.]

1758.

The department shall annually provide an opportunity for licensed hunters to comment and make recommendations on the public hunting programs, including anticipated habitat conditions in the hunting areas on Type A and Type B Wildlife Areas, as defined under the commission’s regulations, through public meetings or other public outreach. In complying with this section, the department may hold regional meetings on its hunting programs for several different wildlife areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 387, Sec. 2.   (SB 749)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Native Species Conservation and Enhancement Account [1760. - 1769.]

1760.

The department shall maintain within the Fish and Game Preservation Fund a Native Species Conservation and Enhancement Account, which is hereby created, to permit separate accountability for the receipt and expenditure of moneys derived through donation from persons or organizations for the support of nongame and native plant species conservation and enhancement programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1181.)
-------------------------------------------

1761.

Whenever the department receives funds from persons or organizations for the support of nongame and native plant species conservation and enhancement programs, such funds shall be deposited in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund and credited to the Native Species Conservation and Enhancement Account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1181.)
-------------------------------------------

1762.

The department shall provide each person or organization making a contribution of five dollars ($5) or more for the support of nongame and native plant species conservation and enhancement programs a suitably prepared certificate, decal, medallion, or other object of public appreciation signifying the interest of such person or organization in the conservation and enhancement of native plant and wildlife species. The commission shall approve the form, nature, and content of any certificate, decal, medallion or other object proposed for use by the department pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1181.)
-------------------------------------------

1763.

The department may take all appropriate measures to encourage donations by individuals, organizations, and public agencies to the Native Species Conservation and Enhancement Account, including, but not limited to, public information concerning the status of native plant and wildlife species threatened by the activities of man. The cost to the department to carry out the provisions of this section may be charged to the Native Species Conservation and Enhancement Account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1181.)
-------------------------------------------

1764.

(a) The director shall designate those particular areas of land managed by the department at which possession of a valid annual wildlife pass or day use pass shall be required. No designation shall be effective until a management plan for the area has been presented at a public meeting and the plan has been approved by the director.

(b) No person shall enter the designated area unless that person possesses an annual wildlife area pass or a day use pass issued pursuant to Section 1765, a valid hunting license issued pursuant to Section 3031, a valid trapping license issued pursuant to Section 4006, or a valid sport fishing license issued pursuant to Section 7149.05, 7150, or 7151, or
 that person is a member of a tour by an organized youth or school group that has been issued a day use pass.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), possession of a license or pass shall not be required of any person who:

(1) Is passing through the area on a public right-of-way.

(2) Possesses authorization by the commission or the department to conduct scientific or educational research.

(3) Is discharging duties in the course of employment, as specified by the department.

(4) Possesses written authorization from the department to enter the area for a specific purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 683, Sec. 15.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1765.

(a) The department may issue an annual wildlife area pass or a day use pass that authorizes the bearer to enter and use facilities and programs on the department managed lands subject to Section 1764 for the period of a calendar year or, if issued after the beginning of the year, for the remainder thereof. The fee for the annual wildlife area pass is ten dollars ($10). The fee for the day use pass is two dollars ($2); however, a tour by an organized youth or school group is exempt from the payment of this fee. The fees shall be adjusted in the calendar years following 1989 in accordance with Section 713. A person under the age of 16 years is exempt from the payment of fees under this section for an annual wildlife area pass or a day use pass.

(b) Any person eligible for a reduced fee or free sportfishing license pursuant to Section 7150 or 7151 shall be issued an annual wildlife area pass upon application therefor and under the same conditions and for the same fee as provided in those sections. There shall be appropriated in the annual Budget Act from the General Fund, for transfer to the Native Species Conservation and Enhancement Account, a sum equal to two dollars ($2) for each free annual wildlife area pass issued pursuant to this subdivision during the preceding calendar year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1539, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

1766.

The department may also offer for sale a native species stamp, promotional materials, and nature study aids. The fee for a native species stamp is seven dollars and fifty cents ($7.50), as adjusted in the calendar years following 1989 in accordance with Section 713.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1539, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

1767.5.

(a) The revenues from fees and sales under this article and Section 1055.3 shall be deposited in the Native Species Conservation and Enhancement Account in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund, and shall be available for appropriation for expenditure in the 1988–89 and subsequent fiscal years in the following order of priority:

(1) Repayment of any loan to the account from the Fish and Game Preservation Fund. The amounts repaid annually shall be prorated to complete the repayment with interest on or before July 1, 1993. Interest shall be calculated at the rate earned by the Surplus Money Investment Fund from the date funds for the loan were advanced to the date of repayment.

(2) The costs of ongoing wildlife management programs incurred at any lands managed by the department alone or cooperatively with other governmental agencies, irrespective of their designation pursuant to Section 1764, that are not adequately funded under subdivision (a) or (c) of Section 711.

(3) The costs of natural history education and recreational programs and improvements at areas designated pursuant to Section 1764.

(4) Augmentation of wildlife management programs and acquisition of additional lands at areas designated pursuant to Section 1764.

(b) Revenues from fees and sales under this article and Section 1055.3 shall be used to augment and not to replace money appropriated from existing funds available to the department for the purposes specified in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1370, Sec. 7.   Effective October 27, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

1768.

The Legislature finds and declares that the revenues from fees and sales under this article are related to the protection and propagation of fish and game within the meaning of Section 9 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1539, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

1769.

The department may take all appropriate measures to encourage persons to obtain annual wildlife area passes and day use passes issued pursuant to Section 1765, and to promote the sale of native species stamps, promotional materials, and nature study aids to provide revenue for the support of the department. The measures may include, but are not limited to, the dissemination of public information concerning the status of wildlife, fish, and plant species, conservation activities of the department, and programs and facilities provided by the department for the enjoyment of the lands managed by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1539, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Endangered and Rare Fish, Wildlife, and Plant Species Conservation and Enhancement Account [1770. - 1772.]

1770.

The department shall maintain within the Fish and Game Preservation Fund an Endangered and Rare Fish, Wildlife, and Plant Species Conservation and Enhancement Account which is hereby created.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1058, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1771.

(a) Whenever the department receives funds from the Treasurer under Article 5 (commencing with Section 18741) of Chapter 3 of Part 10.2 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code for the support of this article, the funds shall be deposited in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund and credited to the Endangered and Rare Fish, Wildlife, and Plant Species Conservation and Enhancement Account. These funds are for the support of programs for endangered and rare animals and native plant species as determined by the commission, related conservation and enhancement programs, and programs for those species which may be candidates for determination as endangered or rare under the criteria developed by the commission.

(b) The
 administrative overhead assessment on that portion of funds deposited in the Endangered and Rare Fish, Wildlife, and Plant Species Conservation and Enhancement Account expended through contracts shall not exceed 15 percent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 22.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1772.

(a) The department may take all appropriate measures to encourage donations to this account through the tax return checkoff system provided for in Article 5 (commencing with Section 18741) of Chapter 3 of Part 10.2 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(b) The department may also disseminate information to the public concerning the status of endangered and rare species.

(c) The cost to the department to carry out the provisions of this section may be charged to this account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 23.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Native California Wildlife Rehabilitation Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund [1773. - 1773.3.]

1773.

The department shall maintain the Native California Wildlife Rehabilitation Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund established pursuant to Section 18749.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 504, Sec. 1.   (AB 1031)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1773.1.

(a) The funds deposited in the Native California Wildlife Rehabilitation Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund pursuant to Article 5.2 (commencing with Section 18749) of Chapter 3 of Part 10.2 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code are to be used for the support of a competitive grant program to be established by the department for the purposes of the rehabilitation of injured, sick, or orphaned wildlife, and wildlife conservation education.

(b) A maximum of 5 percent of the funds allocated to the department may be used to defray the administrative expenses associated with administering the Native California Wildlife Rehabilitation Voluntary Tax Contribution
 Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 360, Sec. 1.   (AB 1828)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1773.2.

To be eligible for grant funding from the competitive grant program established pursuant to Section 1773.1, an applicant shall meet all of the following criteria:

(a) The applicant shall provide proof that it is a nonprofit organization that operates a wildlife rehabilitation facility permitted pursuant to Section 679 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(b) The applicant shall be in compliance with all conditions of its wildlife rehabilitation permit issued by the department and all applicable local, state, and federal laws.

(c) The applicant shall actively use an electronic database to maintain wildlife rehabilitation animal records.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 360, Sec. 2.   (AB 1828)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1773.3.

(a) For purposes of this section, “covered grant” means a grant in an amount no greater than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) with a grant period duration of no more than one year.

(b) In administering the competitive grant program established pursuant to Section 1773.1, the department may distribute up to 100 percent of the grant award of a covered grant upon its execution.

(c) (1) The department shall require a report from a covered grant recipient after the completion of a covered grant award that addresses both of the following:

(A) What objectives were met and the means used to meet them.

(B) What objectives were unmet and the reasons why they were unmet.

(2) A recipient nonprofit that fails to submit the report to the department shall be ineligible to receive a covered grant award for one year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 360, Sec. 3.   (AB 1828)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7.8. Sacramento-San Joaquin Valley Wetlands Mitigation Bank Act of 1993 [1775. - 1796.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [1775. - 1779.5.]

1775.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Sacramento-San Joaquin Valley Wetlands Mitigation Bank Act of 1993.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1254, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1776.

The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(a) Wetlands are an important natural resource of the Sacramento-San Joaquin Valley because they provide significant habitat for migratory waterfowl of the Pacific flyway, for endangered species, and for many other resident wildlife and fish populations. Wetlands provide additional public benefits, including water quality improvement, flood protection, stream bank stabilization, recreation, and scientific research.

(b) Active and voluntary involvement by private landowners is necessary for the long-term availability and productivity of wetlands in the Sacramento-San Joaquin Valley.

(c) Large wetland preserves in the Sacramento-San Joaquin Valley, under certain circumstances, can provide an environmentally preferable alternative to a number of small, isolated wetland preserves of the same type surrounded by urban development.

(d) It is the policy of the state with respect to the Sacramento-San Joaquin Valley:

(1) To provide for the protection, preservation, restoration, enhancement, and expansion of the wetland habitat in the Sacramento-San Joaquin Valley.

(2) To promote the protection, preservation, restoration, enhancement, and expansion of the Sacramento-San Joaquin Valley wetlands in concert with other federal, state, and local programs, and interested parties.

(3) To improve cooperative efforts among private, nonprofit, and public entities for the management and protection of wetlands.

(4) To assure that no net loss of either wetland acreage or habitat values results from activities pursuant to this chapter in the Sacramento-San Joaquin Valley that otherwise comply with state and federal law.

(5) To encourage and maintain a predictable, efficient, and timely regulatory framework for environmentally acceptable development.

(6) To assure that the construction or maintenance of wetland mitigation banks in the Sacramento-San Joaquin Valley does not reduce any local tax base, does not create any uncompensated increased requirement for local services, and does not create conditions that have the potential to adversely affect the public health.

(7) To provide an alternative for accomplishing offsite mitigation in the Sacramento-San Joaquin Valley when offsite mitigation is required under a fill permit issued pursuant to Section 404 of the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1344 et seq.).

(e) This chapter constitutes a nonexclusive alternative to other lawful methods of mitigating project impacts upon wetlands and maintaining and increasing wetlands acreage and habitat values generally. Specifically, this chapter is not intended to, and shall not be interpreted to:

(1) Condone or encourage the removal, loss, or degradation of wetlands.

(2) Condone or encourage the removal, loss, or degradation of habitat for any rare, threatened, or endangered species.

(3) Abrogate any other local, state, or federal law or policy relating to wetlands, nor prohibit any city or county from prohibiting the removal, filling, or other destruction of particular wetlands.

(4) Establish maximum or minimum standards or any other requirements for wetland fill or mitigation, except for mitigation banks established pursuant to this chapter.

(5) Have legal or necessary precedential application to any other area of the state, or to other lands, resources, situations, or circumstances.

(6) Preclude other forms of mitigation banking, including private or for-profit programs, within the Sacramento-San Joaquin Valley.

(7) Be the exclusive method of providing compensation by permittees for the loss of wetlands within the Sacramento-San Joaquin Valley.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1254, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1776.5.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the funds necessary to cover the costs of administering this chapter be provided by the purchase of credits in mitigation bank sites.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1254, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1777.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1254, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1777.2.

“Bank site” or “mitigation bank site” means a publicly or privately owned and operated site on which wetlands have been or will be created in accordance with this chapter to compensate for adverse impacts caused by removal or fill permit activities authorized pursuant to Section 404 of the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1344 et seq.). “Bank site” or “mitigation bank site” may include land on which rice is grown as long as those lands are managed as ricelands and those lands meet the other requirements of Section 1784.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 928, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1777.5.

“Credit” means a numerical value that represents the wetland acreage and habitat values of a mitigation bank site.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1254, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1778.

“Operator” means the department, or a public or private person or entity approved by the department, to administer a wetlands mitigation bank site.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1254, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1778.5.

“Permittee” means a public or private person or entity that meets all of the following conditions:

(a) Has received a permit pursuant to Section 404 of the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1344 et seq.) for the removal or filling of wetlands, subject to a condition that allows the permittee to compensate for the wetland loss through participation in a wetland mitigation bank pursuant to this chapter.

(b) Proposes to compensate for the loss of the wetlands through participation in a wetlands mitigation bank pursuant to this chapter.

(c) Proposes the discharge at a site within a qualifying urban area and not more than 40 miles from a bank site with sufficient acreage of the same types of wetlands that will provide suitable replacement habitat for the values that may be lost from the conversion of the existing wetlands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1254, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1779.

“Qualifying urban area” means any of the following when they occur within the Sacramento-San Joaquin Valley:

(a) A geographical area having a population of 50,000 or more inhabitants within the jurisdiction of a city, or a town, as defined by Sections 20 and 21 of the Government Code.

(b) A portion of any geographical area within a town, as defined in Section 21 of the Government Code, which has a population density equal to, or exceeding, 1,500 persons per square mile and which has a population of 50,000 or more inhabitants.

(c) A geographical area having a population density equal to, or exceeding, 1,500 persons per square mile, and an adjacent city, as defined in Section 20 of the Government Code, where the combined population of the geographical area and the city equals 50,000 or more inhabitants.

(d) A geographical area within the sphere of influence of a city or community services district for which the projected population of the adopted general plan equals 10,000 or more inhabitants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1254, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1779.5.

“Sacramento-San Joaquin Valley” means the central valley region, as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 13200 of the Water Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1254, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Legislative Goals [1780. - 1781.]

1780.

The purpose of this chapter is to ensure that no net loss of wetland acreage or habitat values within the Sacramento-San Joaquin Valley occurs as a result of fill permit activities pursuant to Section 404 of the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1344 et seq.).

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1254, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1781.

It is the state’s goal to increase the total wetlands acreage and values within the Sacramento-San Joaquin Valley.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1254, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Wetlands Mitigation Banks [1784. - 1787.]

1784.

(a) The department, in cooperation with those agencies specified in Section 1786, shall adopt regulations that establish standards and criteria for the bank site qualification process, for the evaluation of wetland habitat acreage and values created at the bank sites, and for the operation and evaluation of bank sites, and any other regulations that are necessary to implement this chapter.

These criteria shall require, at a minimum, that the newly created wetland provide the hydrologic, vegetative, and wildlife characteristics, including the food web components, of a naturally occurring wetland system that is equal to the site being mitigated.

(b) With respect to bank site standards and operator qualifications, the department shall consider, at a minimum, all of the following criteria:

(1) A requirement that the bank site have a reliable, adequate, and available water supply necessary to provide wetland values. For wetlands dependent only on rainfall, rainfall satisfies this requirement.

(2) The relative ease or difficulty of converting uplands into wetlands at the bank site.

(3) The anticipated maintenance necessary to sustain the recreated and created wetlands at the bank site.

(4) The proximity of the bank site to other established preserves or natural features historically associated with abundant wildlife values.

(5) The proximity of the bank site to urban or populated areas that could reduce the bank site’s long-term biological values.

(6) The demonstrated ability of the bank site operator to create, administer, maintain, and protect the bank site in perpetuity in its enhanced state, including financial, technical, and management ability.

(7) The relative abundance or scarcity of the wetland type to be created at the bank site.

(c) A bank site or mitigation bank site may include any lands on which rice is grown as long as those lands are managed as ricelands with the required enhanced wetland values if they otherwise qualify under this chapter and either of the following conditions exist:

(1) The lands are lands on which rice was grown after January 1, 1996. For purposes of this paragraph, to qualify as new wetland values, rice shall not have been grown on the lands for 10 years before the application is submitted pursuant to Section 1785.

(2) The lands are lands on which rice was grown before January 1, 1996. These lands shall qualify only if there is an increase in wetland habitat value that is equal to the site being mitigated. For purposes of this paragraph, a wetland value shall only be provided for lands on which rice was grown that are proposed for wetlands mitigation for the period when that land is flooded between the harvesting of rice and the planting of the next crop. This paragraph shall apply only to lands that were not flooded after harvest between January 1, 1982, and January 1, 1992.

(d) Any mitigation site established pursuant to subdivision (c) may be replaced by a new site of an equal wetland value.

(e) This section shall not be construed to permit waters used to flood rice fields in order to create wetlands mitigation to be credited as beneficial to wildlife under federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 37, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1785.

If any person desires to establish a wetlands mitigation bank site under this chapter, the person shall apply to the department for a determination that the bank site and the operator qualify under the criteria established by the department pursuant to this chapter. The determination that a bank site qualifies under this chapter is a project for purposes of Section 21065 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1254, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1786.

(a) Before any wetlands are created on the bank site qualified pursuant to Section 1785, the department shall coordinate and shall be a signatory to a memorandum of understanding with the operator. The United States Environmental Protection Agency, the United States Army Corps of Engineers, the Fish and Wildlife Service of the United States Department of the Interior, the Central Valley Regional Water Quality Control Board, and the State Department of Health Services or its designee, or any of them, may be signatories by indicating to the department their interest in participating within 90 days of being notified by the department of the department’s intent to initiate the procedures described in this section. Any county located in whole or in part in the Sacramento-San Joaquin Valley may, by ordinance, require that it be a signatory to any memorandum of understanding for a bank site to be established within its boundary.

(b) The memorandum of understanding shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following items:

(1) Identification of the mitigation bank site, including the legal property description, acreage, types, and location of existing wetlands within the boundaries of the bank site.

(2) An agreement, by each of the governmental agencies in subdivision (a), that all new, successfully created wetland acreage shall qualify to be credited against the approved removal or fill of wetlands located in the qualifying urban area and within 40 miles of the bank site and is consistent with the procedures set out in this chapter.

(3) An agreement by the operator to do both of the following:

(A) Maintain all wetland habitat within the bank in optimum condition in perpetuity, barring an unforeseen natural catastrophe that precludes the viability of wetlands.
